test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-elaemae48_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - elämä: # Verb (48) elämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     elämä+V+Inf/mA: elämä
     elämä+V+Inf: elläq
     elämä+V+Act+PrfPrc: elänüq
     elämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: elet

     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: elä
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [elät, elädeq]
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eläs
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: elämiq
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [elätiq, elädeq]
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: eläseq
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: elä
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: elli
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [ellit, elliq, ellideq]
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: elli
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ellimiq
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ellitiq, ellideq]
     elämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [elliq, elliväq]

     elämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eletäs

     elämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: elläv

     elämä+V+Jus: eläguq
